Utah statutes.
26-7-6  (Superseded 07/01/11).   Alcohol retailers to post warnings related
to consumption of alcohol and pregnancy.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Alcohol retailer" means:
(i)  a state store, as defined in Section 32A-1-105;
(ii)  a package agency, as defined in Section 32A-1-105; or
(iii)  one of the following, if required to display a DUI warning under Title
32A, Alcoholic Beverage Control Act:
(A)  a person licensed under Title 32A, Alcoholic Beverage Control Act; or
(B)  a person who holds a permit under Title 32A, Alcoholic Beverage Control
Act.
(b)  "DUI warning" means the statement, "Warning: Driving under the influence
of alcohol or drugs is a serious crime that is prosecuted aggressively in
Utah.", that an alcohol retailer is required to display as a sign in large
letters in a prominent place under the following sections:
(i)  Section 32A-1-107;
(ii)  Section 32A-2-103;
(iii)  Section 32A-3-106;
(iv)  Section 32A-4-106;
(v)  Section 32A-4-206;
(vi)  Section 32A-4-307;
(vii)  Section 32A-4-406;
(viii)  Section 32A-4a-305;
(ix)  Section 32A-5-107;
(x)  Section 32A-6-202; and
(xi)  Section 32A-10-206.
(2) (a)  On and after January 1, 2010, an alcohol retailer shall display, in a
prominent place, a sign in large letters that consists of text in the
following order:
(i)  a header that reads: "WARNING";
(ii)  a warning statement that reads: "Drinking alcoholic beverages during
pregnancy can cause birth defects and permanent brain damage for the child.";
(iii)  a statement in smaller font that reads: "Call the Utah Department of
Health at [insert most current toll-free number] with questions or for more
information.";
(iv)  a header that reads: "WARNING"; and
(v)  a warning statement that contains the DUI warning, except it does not
include the text "Warning:".
(b) (i)  The text described in Subsections (2)(a)(i) through (iii) shall be in
a different font style than the text described in Subsections (2)(a)(iv) and
(v).
(ii)  Both warning statements in the sign described in Subsection (2)(a) shall
be in the same font size.
(3)  The department shall work with the Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission
and the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control to facilitate consistency in
the format of a sign required under this section.
(4) (a)  An alcohol retailer who complies with this section is considered to
be in compliance with a requirement under Title 32A, Alcoholic Beverage
Control Act, to display a DUI warning.
(b)  The department may not take action against an alcohol retailer who
violates this section, but may notify the Department of Alcoholic Beverage
Control of a possible violation of this section.
(c)  An alcohol retailer who violates this section is subject to the same
disciplinary action that the alcohol retailer would be subject to for a
violation of a requirement under Title 32A, Alcoholic Beverage Control Act, to
display a DUI warning.
